new_hnd_mo/without_Z_apertium_hn.dix
<pardef n="so/__v">
<e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>IM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yIM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yIM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yIM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yIM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="Bigo"><i>Bigo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bilo"><i>bilo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bo"><i>bo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="Do"><i>Do</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="Ko"><i>Ko</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="piro"><i>piro</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="ro"><i>ro</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="saMjo"><i>saMjo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="sazjo"><i>sazjo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="Xo"><i>Xo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
